Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 13 Recording of Instruments

34-13-1.
Instruments eligible for recording.

Any of the following instruments shall be recorded or filed by the town clerk or recorder of deeds, in the manner prescribed by law, on request of any person and on payment of the lawful fees therefor:

Letters of attorney.

All contracts for sale of land.

Bonds for title or covenants or powers concerning lands, tenements and hereditaments.

All notices to be filed under the provisions of §

9-4-9

.

All notices and process to be filed under other statutory provisions, and all decrees in equity and judgments at law affecting the title to land.

All instruments evidencing or relating to a security interest in personal property or fixtures that may be filed pursuant to chapter 9 of title 6A.

All instruments required by statute to be recorded, including deeds, mortgages and transfers and discharges thereof, leases or memoranda thereof, and transfers and cancellations thereof, and the covenants, conditions, agreements and powers therein contained.

Instruments of defeasance.

Instruments (excepting wills) creating trusts.

All instruments and notices, affecting, or purporting to affect, the title to land or any interest therein or giving or terminating the right to sever any building or part thereof or fixture, when signed and acknowledged as required for deeds.

All affidavits as to family facts, including dates of birth, marriage, and death, which relate or purport to relate to title to land.

All affidavits as to bounds and monuments of land.

All certificates of the secretary of state as to change of corporate name.

All original linen and/or original mylar maps, plats, surveys, and drawings, whether or not attached to, or a part of, another recordable instrument, Provided, however, That those requiring the approval of any council; commission, officer, or other body by law shall not be recorded without such approval.

All survey plans received for recording shall be drawn on archival mylar or linen, those of which shall not exceed a size of 24" x 36" and shall be recorded as originally drafted.
Said plans shall contain as a minimum all items set forth in the “Procedural and Technical Standards for the practice of Land Surveying in the State of Rhode Island and Providence Plantations” as adopted by the Rhode Island Board of Registration of Professional Land Surveyors effective April 1, 1994 and any amendments or modifications thereof.
Further, all plans must be able to be reproduced so that the contents of said plans are legible.

Indexes of survey plans shall be maintained indicating (a) the title of the plan; and (b) the street(s) or road(s) on which the subject property abuts.
Such plans shall include a separate listing, in or attached to the legend on the plan, of all streets and roads on which the subject property abuts.

All declarations of restrictions and covenants in connection with a plat of record or to be recorded or with a tract or parcel of land which is to be subdivided.

Statements of covenants, conditions, and powers of sale which are intended to be incorporated in mortgages by reference.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 202, § 6; C.P.A. 1905, § 1139; G.L. 1909, ch. 253, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 297, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 435, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

34-13-1

; P.L. 1956, ch. 3750, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 380, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 318, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 303, § 1.

34-13-2.
Recording as constructive notice.

A recording or filing under §

34-13-1

shall be constructive notice to all persons of the contents of instruments and other matters so recorded, so far as they are genuine.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 202, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 253, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 297, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 435, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

34-13-2

.

34-13-3.
Affidavits as to acts under power of sale.

Whenever any administrator, executor, guardian, receiver, sheriff, mortgagee or any person acting under a power of sale in any mortgage deed, deed of trust or other conveyance, sells or causes to be sold any real estate lying within this state, the title to which will in any manner depend upon notice of sale to be published in any newspaper, if the person or persons causing the sale to be made causes a copy of the advertisement, in pursuance of which the sale is made, to be attached to the deed given thereunder, together with his, her or their affidavit, or, if a corporation, the affidavit of its duly authorized officer, stating when, how many times and in what newspaper or newspapers the advertisement was published, and the manner, time and place of making the sale, the copy and affidavit shall be recorded with the deed to which they are attached, and the record thereof shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of the matters and things therein stated, but the omission of the copy and affidavit shall not affect the validity of the conveyance if otherwise valid.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 202, § 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 253, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 297, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 435, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

34-13-3

.

34-13-4.
Entry of time of presentation for recording — Receiving book.

Whenever any instrument entitled to be recorded shall be presented for recording, the town clerk or recorder of deeds, as the case may be, immediately upon its presentment, shall cause to be entered in writing on the instrument the day, the hour, and the minute when the instrument was presented for recording, and shall enter this information, in the order of presentment, in a receiving book to be kept for that purpose.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 202, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 253, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 297, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 435, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

34-13-4

.

34-13-5.
Index of instruments recorded.

It shall be the duty of the clerk or recorder of deeds of each city and town within the state to make and keep a separate alphabetical general index of all deeds, mortgages, and other instruments recorded in the office of the city or town clerk or recorder of deeds, which indices shall refer to the book and page of the records wherein the deeds, mortgages, and other instruments are recorded. Mortgage discharges and assignments of mortgage shall be indexed under the names of all parties to the original mortgage instrument and all subsequent assignees of parties to the original instrument.

The provisions of §§

45-13-7

—

45-13-10

shall not apply to this section.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 41, § 6; P.L. 1899, ch. 663, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 51, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 52, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 334, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

34-13-5

; P.L. 1986, ch. 323, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 226, § 1.

34-13-6.
Recording of certified copies.

If any instrument has been recorded or filed by a city or town clerk, or recorder of deeds, in the manner prescribed by law, a copy thereof duly certified by the proper official may be recorded or filed in the office of any city or town clerk or recorder of deeds, wherein the original might properly have been recorded or filed, and, when so recorded or filed, shall have the same effect as a recording or filing of the original instrument.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 297, § 25; P.L. 1933, ch. 2044, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 435, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

34-13-6

.

34-13-7.
General recording fees.

The fees to the recording officers for recording the following described instruments relating to real estate shall be as follows:

The recording officers shall be allowed to charge a rate of one dollar ($1.00) for each additional page or fraction over.

Ten percent (10%) of the recording fees provided for in this section shall be utilized by each city or town for the purposes of document preservation and technological upgrades.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, the recording fee for lis pendens and/or bail property liens recorded by bailbondsmen and the recording fee to discharge lis pendens and/or bail property liens recorded by bailbondsmen shall be ten dollars ($10.00).

Warranty deed $80.00 Quitclaim deed 80.00 Deed of executor, administrator, trustee, conservator, receiver, or commissioner 80.00 Mortgage 60.00 Partial release of mortgage 45.00 Assignment of mortgage 45.00 Foreclosure deed under power of sale with affidavit 80.00 Lease 60.00 General assignment 45.00 Discharge of mortgage 45.00 Discharge of attachment or execution 45.00 Any other instrument not otherwise expressly provided for by statute 45.00 Lien – Federal tax 7.25 Lien – Federal tax, discharge of 7.25 Maps, plats, surveys, drawings (not attached to or a part of another recordable instrument) 45.00 Bill of sale 45.00 Power of attorney 45.00 Lis pendens 80.00 Writ of attachment or execution affecting title to real estate 10.00 Writ of attachment or lien affecting title to mobile and manufactured homes 2.00 Notice of intention under the mechanics’ lien law 8.00 Account under mechanics’ lien law 10.00

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1056, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 436, § 17; P.L. 1955, ch. 3568, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-13-7

; P.L. 1960, ch. 147, § 3; P.L. 1970, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 325, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 376, art. 7, § 10; P.L. 2004, ch. 448, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 90, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 112, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 374, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 396, § 1.

34-13-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1056, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 436, § 18; P.L. 1955, ch. 3568, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-13-8

; P.L. 1970, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 331, § 3; P.L. 1989, ch. 209, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 374, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 396, § 2, effective June 21, 2012.

34-13-9.
Fees for copies of record.

Recording officers shall charge one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per page and three dollars ($3.00) for certifying of the record of any instrument described in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1927, ch. 1056, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 436, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

34-13-9

; P.L. 1970, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 323, § 1.

34-13-10.
Return of recorded documents.

Any instrument presented for recording in the records of land evidence, which original is intended to be returned to the person recording or to an address previously indicated, shall be forwarded within one hundred eighty (180) days of the date the instrument was actually recorded.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 290, § 1.

34-13-11.
Change in name or status of owner of real estate.

Any person, corporation or limited liability company owning real estate or having an interest therein whose name has been changed, any corporation which has been merged into or consolidated with another, and any general or limited partnership which has converted to a limited liability company, shall, within sixty (60) days after the change, merger, consolidation, or conversion file with the city or town clerk or the recorder of deeds of the city or town in which the real estate is located a certificate, duly acknowledged, notarized, giving the name before and after the change, merger, consolidation or conversion and the city or town clerk or recorder of deeds shall record and index the certificate in the land records.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 417, § 1.

34-13-12.
Conveyance of property acquired prior to change of name.

Any person or corporation who conveys property acquired prior to a change of name shall state in the instrument of conveyance the name under which that person or corporation acquired the property, and the city or town clerk or recorder of deeds shall index the record of the instrument in the name under which the property was acquired and in the name under which it was transferred.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 417, § 1.